Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-614] Autism benefits and coverage;
notice; definitions. (a) Each hospital and medical service plan contract
issued or renewed in this State after January 1, 2016, shall provide to the
member and individuals under fourteen years of age covered under the plan
contract coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism.

(b) This section shall not apply to
disability, accident-only, medicare, medicare supplement, student accident and
health or sickness insurance, dental-only, and vision-only policies or policies
or renewals of six months or less.

(c) Every mutual benefit society shall provide
written notice to its members regarding the coverage required by this section.
The notice shall be in writing and prominently positioned in any literature or
correspondence sent to members and shall be transmitted to members within
calendar year 2016 when annual information is made available to members or in
any other mailing to members, but in no case later than December 31, 2016.

(d) Coverage for applied behavioral analysis
provided under this section shall be subject to a maximum benefit of $25,000
per year for services for children ages thirteen and under. This section shall
not be construed as limiting benefits that are otherwise available to a member
under a hospital and medical service plan contract. Payments made on behalf of
a member for any care, treatment, intervention, or service other than applied
behavioral analysis shall not be applied toward the maximum benefit established
under this subsection.

(e) Coverage under this section may be subject
to copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions of a policy that are no
less favorable than the copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions for
substantially all medical services covered by the plan contract.

(f) Treatment for autism requests shall
include a treatment plan. Except for inpatient services, if an individual is
receiving treatment for autism, a mutual benefit society may request a review
of the treatment plan for continued authorization of coverage for treatment for
autism at the mutual benefit society's discretion.

(g) The medical necessity of treatment covered
by this section shall be determined pursuant to the plan contract and shall be
defined in the plan contract in a manner that is consistent with other services
covered under the plan contract. Except for inpatient services, if an
individual is receiving treatment for autism, a mutual benefit society may
request a review of the medical necessity of that treatment at the society's
discretion.

(h) This section shall not be construed as
reducing any obligation to provide services to an individual under any publicly
funded program, an individualized family service plan, an individualized
education program, or an individualized service plan.

(i) Coverage under this section shall exclude
coverage for:

(1) Care that is custodial in nature;

(2) Services and supplies that are not clinically
appropriate;

(3) Services provided by family or household members;

(4) Treatments considered experimental; and

(5) Services provided outside of the State.

(j) Mutual benefit societies shall include in
their network of approved autism service providers only those providers who
have cleared state and federal criminal background checks as determined by the
society.

(k) If an individual has been diagnosed as
having autism meeting the diagnostic criteria described in the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders available at the time of diagnosis, upon
publication of a more recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual
of Mental Disorders, that individual may be required to undergo repeat
evaluation to remain eligible for coverage under this section.

(l) Treatment for autism shall not be covered
pursuant to this section unless provided by an autism service provider that is
licensed by a state licensure board. If a state licensure board that licenses
providers to provide autism services is unavailable, the autism service
provider shall:

(1) Be certified by the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board, Inc.; provided that certification by the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board, Inc., shall be valid for purposes of this subsection for
no more than one year; or

(2) Meet any existing credentialing requirements
determined by the mutual benefit society.

(m) As used in this section, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:

"Applied behavior analysis" means the
design, implementation, and evaluation of environmental modifications, using
behavioral stimuli and consequences, to produce socially significant
improvement in human behavior, including the use of direct observation,
measurement, and functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.

"Autism" means autism spectrum
disorder as defined by the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

"Autism service provider" means any
person, entity, or group that provides treatment for autism and meets the
minimum requirements pursuant to subsection (l).

"Behavioral health treatment" means
evidence based counseling and treatment programs, including applied behavior
analysis, that are:

(1) Necessary to develop, maintain, or restore, to
the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual; and

(2) Provided or supervised by an autism service
provider.

"Diagnosis of autism" means medically
necessary assessments, evaluations, or tests conducted to diagnose whether an
individual has autism.

"Pharmacy care" means medications
prescribed by a licensed physician or registered nurse practitioner and any
health-related services that are deemed medically necessary to determine the
need or effectiveness of the medications.

"Psychiatric care" means direct or
consultative services provided by a licensed psychiatrist.

"Psychological care" means direct or
consultative services provided by a licensed psychologist.

"Therapeutic care" means services
provided by licensed speech pathologists, registered occupational therapists,
licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, or licensed physical
therapists.

"Treatment for autism" includes the
following care prescribed or ordered for an individual diagnosed with autism by
a licensed physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed clinical social
worker, or registered nurse practitioner if the care is determined to be
medically necessary:

(1) Behavioral health treatment;

(2) Pharmacy care;

(3) Psychiatric care;

(4) Psychological care; and

(5) Therapeutic care. [L 2015, c 235, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next